Tennessee, session 114, SB0299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-7-103(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) The governor shall appoint three (3) members, with one (1) appointed from
each grand division and:
(A) One (1) member who:
(i) Is a patient who has been diagnosed with a qualifying medical
disease or condition and who can establish the diagnosis for purposes of
appointment to and service on the commission with a valid letter of
attestation; or
(ii) Is the caregiver of a patient described in subdivision
(a)(3)(A)(i) or who was a caregiver for a patient as described in
subdivision (a)(3)(A)(i) and the patient is now deceased;
(B) One (1) member who is a subject matter expert with knowledge of
how cannabis is cultivated, processed, shipped, distributed, or prescribed for
medical use; and
(C) One (1) member who meets the qualifications for appointment under
subdivision (a)(3)(A) or (B).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-7-109(d), is amended by deleting
the language " The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the general
SB0299
002150
- 1 -

assembly relating to the medical use of cannabis in this state." and substituting "The
commission shall report its findings and recommendations, including, but not limited to, policy
recommendations, to the general assembly relating to the medical use of cannabis in this
state.".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002150